Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6232.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11f. (1) At the request of the sheriff of the county or the director or administrator of the county's emergency 9-1-1 district, as that term is defined in section 102 of the emergency 9-1-1 service enabling act, 1986 PA 32, MCL 484.1102, the county board of commissioners may create a county towing and recovery authority board. (2) The county board of commissioners shall appoint the members of the county towing and recovery authority board. The county towing and recovery authority board must consist of the following members: (a) One individual who is a member of the county board of commissioners. (b) Two individuals representing law enforcement agencies in the county. (c) Two individuals representing a towing service provider that renders towing services in the county under sections 252a, 252b, 252d, and 618a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.252a, 257.252b, 257.252d, and 257.618a. (d) One individual who is a resident of the county. (e) One individual who is a local government officer in a city, township, or village located in the county. (f) The director or administrator of the county's emergency 9-1-1 district, as that term is defined in section 102 of the emergency 9-1-1 service enabling act, 1986 PA 32, MCL 484.1102, or the director's or administrator's designee, who serves as a nonvoting, ex-officio member of the county towing and recovery authority board. (3) Of the members first appointed under subsection (2)(a) to (e), 3 must be appointed for 3-year terms, 2 must be appointed for 2-year terms, and 2 must be appointed for a 1-year term. After the first appointments, the term of a member of the county towing and recovery authority board appointed under subsection (2)(a) to (e) is 4 years, or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2), whichever is later. (4) If a vacancy occurs on the county towing and recovery authority board, the county board of commissioners shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term in the same manner as the appointment is made for the full term. (5) The county board of commissioners may remove a member of the county towing and recovery authority board for malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office. (6) The chairperson of the county board of commissioners shall call the first meeting of the county towing and recovery authority board. At the first meeting, the county towing and recovery authority board shall elect a member as the chairperson and a member as the vice-chairperson and may elect other officers that the board considers necessary or appropriate. The county towing and recovery authority board shall meet at least quarterly or at the call of the chairperson. In addition, the county towing and recovery authority board shall meet at the request of 3 or more members. (7) Four members of the county towing and recovery authority board constitutes a quorum for transacting business. A vote in favor by 4 members of the county towing and recovery authority board serving is required for any action of the county towing and recovery authority board. (8) The county towing and recovery authority board shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (9) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the county towing and recovery authority board in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (10) A member of the county towing and recovery authority board is not entitled to compensation for service on the county towing and recovery authority board, but the county board of commissioners may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. (11) The county towing and recovery authority board shall report annually to the county board of commissioners about the activities of the county towing and recovery authority board under this section. (12) Except as otherwise provided by law, the county towing and recovery authority board may do any of the following: (a) Promulgate rules and procedures under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, for implementing and overseeing towing service providers that render towing services in the county under sections 252a, 252b, 252d, and 618a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.252a, 257.252b, 257.252d, and 257.618a. (b) Solicit requests for proposals or towing service provider applications. (c) Create towing service provider districts. (d) Create towing service provider equipment standards. (e) Create towing service provider operator standards, qualifications, and training. (f) Subject to subsection (13), establish a complaint process and procedure for any violation of rules promulgated under this section. (13) If a complaint is filed against a towing service provider for a violation of a rule promulgated under this section, the county towing and recovery authority board shall meet not later than 30 days after receiving a complaint alleging a violation of the county towing and recovery authority board's rules. (14) A complaint filed under this section is subject to the county towing and recovery authority board's authority only if no other action has been filed in a court of this state.